California statutes. Business and Professions Code
In each year, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall compile and may thereafter publish and sell a complete directory of all persons within the state who hold unforfeited and unrevoked certificates to practice chiropractic, and whose certificate in any manner authorizes the treatment of human beings for diseases, injuries, deformities, or any other physical or mental conditions.

The directory shall contain:

(a) The following information concerning each such person:

(1) The name, address, telephone number, and email of such person.

(2) The names and symbols indicating
 their title.

(3) The school, attendance at which qualified them for examination or admission to practice.

(4) The date of the issuance of their certificate.

(b) The annual report of the board for the prior year.

(c) Information relating to other laws of this state and the United States which the board determines to be of interest to persons licensed to practice chiropractic.

(d) Copies of opinions of the Attorney General relating to the practice of chiropractic.

(e) A copy of the provisions of this chapter and a copy of the act cited in Section 1000.

The board may require the persons
 designated in this section to furnish such information as it may deem necessary to enable it to compile the directory. Every person so designated shall report immediately each and every change of residence or contact information, giving both their old and new address or contact information, as applicable.

The directory shall be evidence of the right of the persons named in it to practice unless their certificate to practice chiropractic has been canceled, suspended, or revoked. The board may collect from each person who voluntarily subscribes to or purchases a copy of the directory the cost of publication and distribution thereof, except that one copy of the directory shall be distributed without charge to each certificate holder of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 623, Sec. 2.   (SB 1434)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1002.

Whenever any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any acts or practices which constitute or will constitute an offense against the Chiropractic Act or its rules or regulations, the superior court of any county, on application of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, or on application of 10 or more persons licensed under the Chiropractic Act may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining that conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1003.

(a) Except as otherwise allowed by law, the employment of runners, cappers, steerers, or other persons to procure patients constitutes unprofessional conduct.

(b) A licensee of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall have his or her license to practice revoked for a period of 10 years upon a second conviction for violating any of the following provisions or upon being convicted of more than one count of violating any of the following provisions in a single case: Section 650 of this code, Section 750 or 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, or Section 549 or 550 of the Penal Code. After the expiration of this 10-year period, an application for license reinstatement may be made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10 of the Chiropractic Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 867, Sec. 5.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1004.

The State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall investigate any licensee against whom an information or indictment has been filed that alleges a violation of Section 550 of the Penal Code or Section 1871.4 of the Insurance Code, if the district attorney does not otherwise object to initiating an investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 867, Sec. 6.   Approved in Proposition 44 at the March 5, 2002, election.)
-------------------------------------------

1005.

The provisions of Sections 12.5, 23.9, 29.5, 30, 31, 35, 104, 114, 115, 119, 121, 121.5, 125, 125.6, 136, 137, 140, 141, 143, 163.5, 461, 462, 475, 480, 484, 485, 487, 489, 490, 490.5, 491, 494, 495, 496, 498, 499, 510, 511, 512, 701, 702, 703, 704, 710, 716, 730.5, 731, and 851 are applicable to persons licensed by the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners under the Chiropractic Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.

(a) By January 1, 2027, the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature that contains, but is not limited to, an update on the status of the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners’ license fee structure and whether the board needs to consider plans for restructuring its license fees.

(b) The report to the Legislature under subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 623, Sec. 3.   (SB 1434)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1006.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, the amount of regulatory fees necessary to carry out the responsibilities required by the Chiropractic Initiative Act and this chapter are, unless a lower fee is adopted by the board by regulation, fixed in the following schedule:

(a) Fee to apply for a license to practice chiropractic: three hundred forty-five dollars ($345).

(b) Fee for initial license to practice chiropractic: one hundred thirty-seven dollars ($137).

(c) The fee to renew an active or inactive license to practice chiropractic shall be three hundred
 thirty-six dollars ($336) and may be increased to not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and, if a lower fee is fixed by the board, shall be an amount sufficient to support the functions of the board in the administration of the Chiropractic Initiative Act and this chapter.

(d) Fee to apply for approval as a continuing education provider: two hundred ninety-one dollars ($291).

(e) Biennial continuing education provider renewal fee:
 one hundred eighteen dollars ($118).

(f) Fee to apply for approval of a continuing education course: one hundred sixteen dollars ($116) per hour of instruction.

(g) Fee to apply for a satellite office certificate:
 sixty-nine dollars ($69).

(h) Fee to renew a satellite office certificate: fifty dollars ($50).

(i) Fee to apply for a license to practice chiropractic pursuant to Section 9 of the Chiropractic Initiative Act: two hundred eighty-three dollars ($283).

(j) Fee to apply for a certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation: one
 hundred seventy-one dollars ($171).

(k) Fee to renew a certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation: sixty-two dollars ($62).

(l) Fee to file a chiropractic corporation special report: ninety-eight dollars ($98).

(m) Fee to apply for approval as a referral
 service:
 two hundred seventy-nine dollars ($279).

(n) Fee for an endorsed verification of licensure: eighty-three dollars ($83).

(o) Fee for replacement of a lost or destroyed license: seventy-one dollars ($71).

(p) Fee for replacement of a satellite office certificate:
 seventy-one dollars ($71).

(q) Fee for replacement of a certificate of registration of a chiropractic corporation: seventy dollars ($70).

(r) Fee to restore a forfeited or canceled license to practice chiropractic: double the annual renewal fee specified in subdivision (c).

(s) Fee to apply for approval to serve as a preceptor:
 seventy-two dollars ($72).

(t) Fee to petition for reinstatement of a revoked license:
 four thousand one hundred eighty-five dollars ($4,185).

(u) Fee to petition for early termination of probation: three thousand one hundred ninety-five dollars ($3,195).

(v) Fee to petition for reduction of penalty: three thousand one hundred ninety-five dollars ($3,195).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 623, Sec. 4.   (SB 1434)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1007.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), the board shall require a licensee to provide a separate disclosure that includes the licensee’s probation status, the length of the probation, the probation end date, all practice restrictions placed on the licensee by the board, the board’s telephone number, and an explanation of how the patient can find further information on the licensee’s probation on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information internet website, to a patient or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate before the patient’s first visit following the probationary order while the licensee is on probation pursuant to a probationary order.

(b) A licensee required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a)
 shall obtain from the patient, or the patient’s guardian or health care surrogate, a separate, signed copy of that disclosure.

(c) A licensee shall not be required to provide a disclosure pursuant to subdivision (a) if any of the following applies:

(1) The patient is unconscious or otherwise unable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy of the disclosure pursuant to subdivision (b) and a guardian or health care surrogate is unavailable to comprehend the disclosure and sign the copy.

(2) The visit occurs in an emergency room. 

(3) The licensee does not have a direct treatment relationship with the patient.

(d) The board shall provide the following information, with respect to
 licensees on probation and licensees practicing under probationary licenses, in plain view on the licensee’s profile page on the board’s online license information internet website.

(1) For probation imposed pursuant to a stipulated settlement, the causes alleged in the operative accusation along with a designation identifying those causes by which the licensee has expressly admitted guilt and a statement that acceptance of the settlement is not an admission of guilt.

(2) For probation imposed by an adjudicated decision of the board, the causes for probation stated in the final probationary order.

(3) For a licensee granted a probationary license, the causes by which the probationary license was imposed.

(4) The length of the probation and end date.

(5) All practice restrictions placed on the license by the board.

(e) “Board” for purposes of this section means the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 623, Sec. 5.   (SB 1434)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Chiropractic Corporations [1050. - 1058.]

1050.

A chiropractic corporation is a corporation which is registered with the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners with reference to corporations rendering professional services as chiropractors and has a currently effective certificate of registration from the board pursuant to the Professional Corporation Act, as contained in Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, and this article. Subject to all applicable statutes, rules and regulations, such chiropractic corporation is entitled to practice chiropractic. With respect to a chiropractic corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Professional Corporation Act is the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners with reference to corporations rendering professional services as chiropractors. As used in this article, the “board” refers to the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

1051.

An applicant for registration as a chiropractic corporation shall supply to the board all necessary and pertinent documents and information requested by the board concerning the applicant’s plan of operations. The board may provide forms of application. If the board finds that the corporation is duly organized and existing pursuant to the General Corporation Law, that each officer as provided in Section 1055, director, shareholder and each employee who will render professional services is a licensed person as defined in the Professional Corporation Act, and that from the application it appears that the affairs of the corporation will be conducted in compliance with law and the rules and regulations of the board, the board shall upon payment of the registration fee in such amount as it may determine issue a certificate of registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

1053.

Each chiropractic corporation shall file with the board a report containing such information relating to professional corporations as may be required by board regulations as well as information required by law. The fee for filing such a report shall be fixed by the board. All reports shall be signed and verified by an officer of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

1054.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the name of a chiropractic corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services, shall contain the name or the last name of one or more of the present, prospective, or former shareholders, and shall include the word “chiropractic” and the word “corporation” or wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 695, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

1055.

Except as provided in Section 13403 of the Corporations Code, relating to the Professional Corporation Act, each director and each officer of a chiropractic corporation, except an assistant secretary and an assistant treasurer, shall be a licensed person as defined in the Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

1056.

The income of a chiropractic corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of such shareholder or his shares in the chiropractic corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

1057.

A chiropractic corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes, rules and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under the Chiropractic Act. The board shall have the same powers of suspension, revocation and discipline against a chiropractic corporation as are now or hereafter authorized by the initiative measure mentioned in Section 1000 or by any other similar statute against individual licensees, provided, however, that proceedings against a chiropractic corporation shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a chiropractic corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of such corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Professional Corporation Act), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of such corporation within such time as such rules and regulations may provide, and (b) that a chiropractic corporation as a condition of obtaining a certificate pursuant to the Professional Corporation Act and this article shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------

1058.

Moneys received by the board pursuant to this article shall be used to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1110.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Clinical Laboratory Technology [1200. - 1327.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [1200. - 1214.]

1200.

Every provision of this chapter shall be liberally construed to protect the interests of all persons affected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1727.)
-------------------------------------------

1201.

As used in this chapter, “person” includes firm, association, partnership, individual, limited liability company, and corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.

As used in this chapter, “department” means the State Department of Public Health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   (AB 383)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1202.5.

(a) For purposes of this chapter “CLIA” means the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a; P.L. 100-578) and the regulations adopted thereunder by the federal Health Care Financing Administration and effective on January 1, 1994, or any later date, when adopted in California pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1208.

(b) For purposes of this chapter “HCFA” means the Health Care Financing Administration of the federal Department of Health and Human Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 510, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1203.

As used in this chapter, “clinical laboratory bioanalyst” or “bioanalyst” means a person licensed under Section 1260 to engage in clinical laboratory practice and direction of a clinical laboratory.

(a) A person licensed as a clinical laboratory bioanalyst or bioanalyst and qualified under CLIA, who is not the CLIA laboratory director, may perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations classified as of high complexity under CLIA and the duties and responsibilities of a laboratory director in the specialties of histocompatibility, microbiology, diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology, immunohematology, genetics, reproductive biology, or other specialty or subspecialty specified in regulations adopted
 by the department.

(b) A person licensed as a clinical laboratory bioanalyst or bioanalyst and qualified under CLIA may perform the duties and responsibilities of a CLIA laboratory director, technical consultant, clinical consultant, technical supervisor, and general supervisor, as specified under CLIA, in the specialties of histocompatibility, microbiology, diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology, immunohematology, genetics, reproductive biology, or other specialty or subspecialty specified in regulations adopted by the department.

(c) A person licensed as a clinical laboratory bioanalyst or bioanalyst may perform any clinical laboratory test or examination classified as waived or of moderate complexity under CLIA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 473, Sec. 1.   (SB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1204.

As used in this chapter, “clinical laboratory scientist” means a person, other than a licensed clinical laboratory bioanalyst or trainee, who is licensed under Sections 1261 and 1262 to engage in clinical laboratory practice under the overall operation and administration of a laboratory director, unless serving as a director of a waived laboratory as provided in Section 1209. A person licensed as a clinical laboratory scientist and qualified under CLIA may perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations classified as of high complexity under CLIA and the duties and responsibilities of a waived laboratory director, as specified under CLIA, technical consultant, clinical consultant, technical supervisor, and general supervisor, as specified under CLIA, in the
 specialties of histocompatibility, microbiology, diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology, immunohematology, reproductive biology, genetics, or other specialty or subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department. A person licensed as a “clinical laboratory scientist” may perform any clinical laboratory test or examination classified as waived or of moderate complexity under CLIA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   (SB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1205.

As used in this chapter, “trainee” means a person licensed under this chapter for the purpose of receiving comprehensive practical experience and instruction in clinical laboratory procedures in one of the sciences or in general clinical laboratory science under the direct and responsible supervision of a person authorized to direct a laboratory under the provisions of this chapter, clinical laboratory scientist, clinical chemist scientist, clinical microbiologist scientist, clinical toxicologist scientist, clinical immunohematologist scientist, clinical genetic molecular biologist scientist, clinical cytogeneticist scientist, clinical histocompatibility scientist, clinical laboratory geneticist scientist, clinical reproductive
 biologist scientist, or other equivalent licensee in the science or specialty or subspecialty for which the person is licensed in a clinical laboratory certified for this purpose by the department under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 473, Sec. 3.   (SB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter the following definitions are applicable:

(1) “Analyte” means the substance or constituent being measured, including, but not limited to, glucose, sodium, or theophyline, or any substance or property whose presence or absence, concentration, activity, intensity, or other characteristics are to be determined.

(2) “Biological specimen” means any material that is derived from the human body.

(3) “Blood electrolyte analysis” means the measurement of electrolytes in a blood specimen by means of ion selective electrodes
 on instruments specifically designed and manufactured for blood gas and acid-base analysis.

(4) “Blood gas analysis” means a clinical laboratory test or examination that deals with the uptake, transport, and metabolism of oxygen and carbon dioxide in the human body.

(5) “Clinical laboratory test or examination” means the detection, identification, measurement, evaluation, correlation, monitoring, and reporting of any particular analyte, entity, or substance within a biological specimen for the purpose of obtaining scientific data that may be used as an aid to ascertain the presence, progress, and source of a disease or physiological condition in a human being, or used as an aid in the prevention, prognosis, monitoring, or treatment of a physiological or pathological condition in a human
 being, or for the performance of nondiagnostic tests for assessing the health of an individual.

(6) “Clinical laboratory science” means any of the sciences or scientific disciplines used to perform a clinical laboratory test or examination.

(7) “Clinical laboratory practice” means the application of clinical laboratory sciences or the use of any means that applies the clinical laboratory sciences within or outside of a licensed or registered clinical laboratory. Clinical laboratory practice includes consultation, advisory, and other activities inherent to the profession.

(8) “Clinical laboratory” means a place used, or an establishment or institution organized or operated, for the performance of clinical laboratory
 tests or examinations or the practical application of the clinical laboratory sciences. That application may include any means that applies the clinical laboratory sciences.

(9) “Direct and constant supervision” means personal observation and critical evaluation of the activity of unlicensed laboratory personnel by a physician and surgeon, or by a person licensed under this chapter other than a trainee, during the entire time that the unlicensed laboratory personnel are engaged in the duties specified in Section 1269.

(10) “Direct and responsible supervision” means both of the following:

(A) Personal observation and critical evaluation of the activity of a trainee by a physician and surgeon, or by a person licensed
 under this chapter other than a trainee, during the entire time that the trainee is performing clinical laboratory tests or examinations.

(B) Personal review by the physician and surgeon or the licensed person of all results of clinical laboratory testing or examination performed by the trainee for accuracy, reliability, and validity before the results are reported from the laboratory.

(11) “Licensed laboratory” means a clinical laboratory licensed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265.

(12) “Location” means either a street and city address, or a site or place within a street and city address, where any of the clinical laboratory sciences or scientific disciplines are practiced or applied, or where
 any clinical laboratory tests or examinations are performed.

(13) “Physician office laboratory” means a clinical laboratory that is licensed or registered under Section 1265, and that is either: (A) a clinical laboratory that is owned and operated by a partnership or professional corporation that performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations only for patients of five or fewer physicians and surgeons or podiatrists who are shareholders, partners, or employees of the partnership or professional corporation that owns and operates the clinical laboratory; or (B) a clinical laboratory that is owned and operated by an individual licensed physician and surgeon or a podiatrist, and that performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations only for patients of the physician and surgeon or podiatrist who owns and operates the clinical
 laboratory.

(14) “Point-of-care laboratory testing device” means a portable laboratory testing instrument to which the following applies:

(A) It is used within the proximity of the patient for whom the test or examination is being conducted.

(B) It is used in accordance with the patient test management system, the quality control program, and the comprehensive quality assurance program established and maintained by the laboratory pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 1220.

(C) It meets the following criteria:

(i) Performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations classified as waived
 or of moderate complexity under the federal Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments of 1988 (CLIA) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 263a).

(ii) Performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations on biological specimens that require no preparation after collection.

(iii) Provides clinical laboratory tests or examination results without calculation or discretionary intervention by the testing personnel.

(iv) Performs clinical laboratory tests or examinations without the necessity for testing personnel to perform calibration or maintenance, except resetting pursuant to the manufacturer’s instructions or basic cleaning.

(15) “Public health laboratory” means a laboratory that is
 operated by a city or county in conformity with Article 5 (commencing with Section 101150) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations adopted thereunder.

(16) “Registered laboratory” means a clinical laboratory registered pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1265.

(17) “Specialty” means histocompatibility, microbiology, diagnostic immunology, chemistry, hematology, immunohematology, pathology, genetics, reproductive biology, or other specialty specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(18) “Subspecialty” means all of the following:

(A) For purposes of
 microbiology, means bacteriology, mycobacteriology, mycology, parasitology, virology, molecular biology, and serology for diagnosis of infectious diseases, or other subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(B) For purposes of diagnostic immunology, means syphilis serology, general immunology, or other subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(C) For purposes of chemistry, means routine chemistry, clinical microscopy, endocrinology, toxicology, or other subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(D) For purposes of immunohematology, means ABO/Rh Type and Group, antibody detection for transfusion, antibody detection nontransfusion, antibody identification,
 compatibility, or other subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(E) For pathology, means tissue pathology, oral pathology, diagnostic cytology, or other subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(F) For purposes of genetics, means molecular biology related to the diagnosis of human genetic abnormalities, cytogenetics, biochemical genetics, laboratory genetics, or other subspecialty
 specified by regulation adopted by the department.

(G) For purposes of reproductive biology, means andrology and embryology, including diagnostic testing for management of primary and secondary infertility, fertility assessment, and fertility preservation, as well as the evaluation and assessment of gametes and embryos and their associated fluids and tissues, or other subspecialty specified by regulation adopted by the department. Reproductive biology does not include the qualitative assessment of sperm in preparation for intrauterine insemination.

(b) This chapter does not restrict, limit, or prevent a person licensed to provide health care services under the laws of this state, including, but not limited to, licensed physicians and surgeons and registered nurses, from
 practicing the profession or occupation for which the person is licensed.

(c) This chapter does not authorize a person to perform or order health care services, or utilize the results of the clinical laboratory test or examination, unless the person is otherwise authorized to provide that care or utilize the results. The inclusion of a person in Section 1206.5 for purposes of performing a clinical laboratory test or examination does not authorize a person, who is not otherwise authorized, to perform venipuncture, arterial puncture, or skin puncture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   (SB 1267)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1206.5.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1206 and except as otherwise provided in Sections 1206.6 and 1241, no person shall perform a clinical laboratory test or examination classified as waived under CLIA unless the clinical laboratory test or examination is performed under the overall operation and administration of the laboratory director, as described in Section 1209, including, but not limited to, documentation by the laboratory director of the adequacy of the qualifications and competency of the personnel, and the test is performed by any of the following persons:

(1) A licensed physician and surgeon holding a M.D. or D.O. degree.

(2) A licensed podiatrist, a licensed dentist, or a
 licensed naturopathic doctor, if the results of the tests can be lawfully utilized within their practice.

(3) A person licensed under this chapter to engage in clinical laboratory practice or to direct a clinical laboratory.

(4) A person authorized to perform tests pursuant to a certificate issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 101150) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) A licensed physician assistant if authorized by a supervising physician and surgeon in accordance with Section 3502 or 3535.

(6) A person licensed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700).

(7) A person licensed under Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840).

(8) A perfusionist if authorized by and performed in compliance with Section 2590.

(9) A respiratory care practitioner if authorized by and performed in compliance with Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700).

(10) A medical assistant, as defined in Section 2069, if the waived test is performed pursuant to a specific authorization meeting the requirements of Section 2069.

(11) A pharmacist, as defined in Section 4036, if ordering drug therapy-related laboratory tests in compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4052.1 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4052.2, if performing skin puncture in the course of performing routine patient assessment procedures in compliance with Section 4052.1, or if performing testing as
 authorized in Section 4052.4.

(12) A naturopathic assistant, as defined in Sections 3613 and 3640.2, if the waived test is performed pursuant to a specific authorization meeting the requirements of Sections 3613 and 3640.2.

(13) A licensed optometrist as authorized under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 3000).

(14) Other health care personnel providing direct patient care.

(15) Any other person performing nondiagnostic testing pursuant to Section 1244.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1206, no person shall perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations classified as of moderate complexity under CLIA unless the clinical laboratory test or examination is performed under
 the overall operation and administration of the laboratory director, as described in Section 1209, including, but not limited to, documentation by the laboratory director of the adequacy of the qualifications and competency of the personnel, and the test is performed by any of the following persons:

(1) A licensed physician and surgeon holding a M.D. or D.O. degree.

(2) A licensed podiatrist or a licensed dentist if the results of the tests can be lawfully utilized within their practice.

(3) A person licensed under this chapter to engage in clinical laboratory practice or to direct a clinical laboratory.

(4) A person authorized to perform tests pursuant to a certificate issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 101150) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of
 Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code.

(5) A licensed physician assistant if authorized by a supervising physician and surgeon in accordance with Section 3502 or 3535.

(6) A person licensed under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700).

(7) A perfusionist if authorized by and performed in compliance with Section 2590.

(8) A respiratory care practitioner if authorized by and performed in compliance with Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700).

(9) A person performing nuclear medicine technology if authorized by and performed in compliance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 107150) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) Any person if performing blood gas analysis in compliance with Section 1245.

(11) (A) A person certified or licensed as an “Emergency Medical Technician II” or paramedic pursuant to Division 2.5 (commencing with Section 1797) of the Health and Safety Code while providing prehospital medical care, a person licensed as a psychiatric technician under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4500) of Division 2, as a vocational nurse pursuant to Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 2840), or as a midwife licensed pursuant to Article 24 (commencing with Section 2505) of Chapter 5, or certified by the department pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 70001) of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations as a nurse assistant or a home health aide, who provides direct patient care, if the person is performing the test as an adjunct to the provision of direct
 patient care by the person, is utilizing a point-of-care laboratory testing device at a site for which a laboratory license or registration has been issued, meets the minimum clinical laboratory education, training, and experience requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the department, and has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the laboratory director that the person is competent in the operation of the point-of-care laboratory testing device for each analyte to be reported.

(B) Before being authorized by the laboratory director to perform laboratory tests or examinations, testing personnel identified in subparagraph (A) shall participate in a preceptor program until they are able to perform the clinical laboratory tests or examinations authorized in this section with results that are deemed accurate and skills that are deemed competent by the preceptor. For the purposes of this section, a “preceptor program” means an organized system
 that meets regulatory requirements in which a preceptor provides and documents personal observation and critical evaluation, including review of accuracy, reliability, and validity, of laboratory testing performed.

(12) Any other person within a physician office laboratory if the test is performed under the supervision of the patient’s physician and surgeon or podiatrist who shall be accessible to the laboratory to provide onsite, telephone, or electronic consultation as needed, and shall: (A) ensure that the person is performing test methods as required for accurate and reliable tests; and (B) have personal knowledge of the results of the clinical laboratory testing or examination performed by that person before the test results are reported from the laboratory.

(13) A pharmacist, if ordering drug therapy-related laboratory tests in compliance with paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a) of Section 4052.1 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 4052.2.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 1206, no person shall perform clinical laboratory tests or examinations classified as of high complexity under CLIA unless the clinical laboratory test or examination is performed under the overall operation and administration of the laboratory director, as described in Section 1209, including, but not limited to, documentation by the laboratory director of the adequacy of the qualifications and competency of the personnel, and the test is performed by any of the following persons:

(1) A licensed physician and surgeon holding a M.D. or D.O. degree.

(2) A licensed podiatrist or a licensed dentist if the results of the tests can be lawfully utilized within their practice.

(3) A person licensed under this chapter to engage in clinical laboratory practice or to direct a clinical laboratory if the test or examination is within a specialty or subspecialty authorized by the person’s licensure.

(4) A person authorized to perform tests pursuant to a certificate issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 101150) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code if the test or examination is within a specialty or subspecialty authorized by the person’s certification.

(5) A licensed physician assistant if authorized by a supervising physician and surgeon in accordance with Section 3502 or 3535.

(6) A perfusionist if authorized by and performed in compliance with Section 2590.

(7) A respiratory care practitioner if authorized by and performed in compliance with Chapter 8.3 (commencing with Section 3700).
